Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.240

Continuing education.

The department shall adopt a rule requiring completion of continuing education for acupuncturists as a condition of license renewal.

[ 2019 c 308 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.